test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_I_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - st'i - ENGLISH : # CLASS_I

     st'i+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: st'i
     st'i+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'iga
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i
     st'i+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'igáng
     st'i+V+DIRECT+PAST: st'igán
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'igáa
     st'i+V+INDIRECT+PAST: st'igáan
     st'i+V+RELATIVE: st'is
     st'i+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: st'igáas
     st'i+V+NON_FACTIVE: st'iáng
     st'i+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: st'igáa.ang
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igáng
     st'i+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igánggang
     st'i+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: st'igángang
     st'i+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'igáinii
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'igáangaa
     st'i+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'igáangaan
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: st'iäsáa
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: st'iäs
     st'i+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: st'iäsáang
     st'i+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: st'iäsga
     st'i+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: st'iäsáas
     st'i+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: st'iäsáa.ang
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asa'áa
     st'i+V+NEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asa'áang
     st'i+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asaasdláa
     st'i+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asaasdláang
     st'i+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'úuj
     st'i+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'úujang
     st'i+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: st'iäsáa'uujang
     st'i+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: st'i'us
     st'i+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'ujáa
     st'i+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'úujaangaa
     st'i+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: st'iäsáa'us
     st'i+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: st'i'ahlánggang
     st'i+V+CERTAIN+PAST: st'i'ahlánggan
     st'i+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'ahlánggiinii
     st'i+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: st'iäsáa'ahlans
     st'i+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: st'i'ahláns
     st'i+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: st'igáa'ahlang
     st'i+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: st'igáa'ahlanggaa
     st'i+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: st'igáa'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+REFLEXIVE: st'i'ahl
     st'i+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: st'iäséehl
     st'i+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: st'i'úu
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'wáa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'wáa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'wáang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: st'i'wägán
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'áawaa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: st'i'áawaan
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: st'i'wáas
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: st'i'áawaas
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'wáa.ang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'áawaa.ang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igáng'waa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igáng'waang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: st'igáng'waa.ang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'wägíinii
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'wägáangaa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'wägáangaan
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: st'i'wáaäsaa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: st'i'wáaäs
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: st'i'wáaäsaang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: st'i'wáaäsga
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: st'i'wáaäsaas
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'wáaäsaa.ang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'wáa'uuj
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'wáa'uujang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: st'i'wáaäsaa'uujang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: st'i'wáa'us
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'wáa'ujaa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'wáa'uujaangaa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: st'i'wáaäsaa'us
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: st'i'wáa'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: st'i'wáa'ahlanggan
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: st'i'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: st'i'wáa'ahlans
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: st'i'áawaa'ahlang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: st'i'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: st'i'áawaa'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: st'i'wáa'ahl
     st'i+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: st'i'wáaäseehl
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: st'i'áng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'ángga
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'áng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'ánggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: st'i'ánggan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'áangaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: st'i'áangaan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: st'i'áns
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: st'i'áangaas
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'angáng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'áangaa.ang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'i'ánggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igáng'anggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: st'igáng'angang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'ánggiinii
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'ánggaangaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'ánggaangaan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: st'i'ángäsaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: st'i'ángäs
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: st'i'ángäsaang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: st'i'ángäsga
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: st'i'ángäsaas
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'ángäsaa.ang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asaa'áng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asaa'ánggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asaasdlä'áng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'iáng k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'uuj
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'uujang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: st'i'ángäsaa'uujang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'us
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'áng'ujaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áng'uujaangaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: st'i'ángäsaa'us
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: st'i'áang'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: st'i'áang'ahlanggan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áang'ahlanggiinii
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: st'i'ángäsaa'ahlans
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: st'i'áang'ahlans
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: st'i'áangaa'ahlang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: st'i'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: st'i'áangaa'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: st'i'áang'ahl
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: st'i'ángäseehl
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: st'i'áng'uu
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: st'i'áng'wägan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'áng'aawaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: st'i'áng'aawaan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: st'i'áng'waas
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: st'i'áng'aawaas
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'áng'waa.ang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'áng'aawaa.ang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igáng'ang'waa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: st'igáng'ang'waang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: st'igáng'ang'waa.ang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áng'wägiinii
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áng'wägaangaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áng'wägaangaan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: st'i'áng'waaäsaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: st'i'áng'waaäs
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: st'i'áng'waaäsaang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: st'i'áng'waaäsga
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: st'i'áng'waaäsaas
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: st'i'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: st'i'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waa'uuj
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waa'uujang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: st'i'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waa'us
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: st'i'áng'waa'ujaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: st'i'áng'waaäsaa'us
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: st'i'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: st'i'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: st'i'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: st'i'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: st'i'áng'waa'ahlans
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: st'i'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: st'i'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: st'i'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: st'i'áng'waa'ahl
     st'i+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: st'i'áng'waaäseehl
